Illinois, session 104th, SB1336.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Concealed Carry Act is amended by 5changing Section 65 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 66/65)7    Sec. 65. Prohibited areas. 8    (a) A licensee under this Act shall not knowingly carry a 9firearm on or into:10        (1) Any building, real property, and parking area 11    under the control of a public or private elementary or 12    secondary school.13        (2) Any building, real property, and parking area 14    under the control of a preschool pre-school or child care 15    facility, including any room or portion of a building 16    under the control of a preschool pre-school or child care 17    facility. Nothing in this paragraph shall prevent the 18    operator of a child care facility in a family home from 19    owning or possessing a firearm in the home or license 20    under this Act, if no child under child care at the home is 21    present in the home or the firearm in the home is stored in 22    a locked container when a child under child care at the 23    home is present in the home.  SB1336- 2 -LRB104 03854 RLC 13878 b1        (3) Any building, parking area, or portion of a 2    building under the control of an officer of the executive 3    or legislative branch of government, provided that nothing 4    in this paragraph shall prohibit a licensee from carrying 5    a concealed firearm onto the real property, bikeway, or 6    trail in a park regulated by the Department of Natural 7    Resources or any other designated public hunting area or 8    building where firearm possession is permitted as 9    established by the Department of Natural Resources under 10    Section 1.8 of the Wildlife Code. This paragraph does not 11    apply to any rest areas under the control of the 12    Department of Transportation or to buildings located in 13    rest areas under the control of the Department of 14    Transportation.15        (4) Any building designated for matters before a 16    circuit court, appellate court, or the Supreme Court, or 17    any building or portion of a building under the control of 18    the Supreme Court.19        (5) Any building or portion of a building under the 20    control of a unit of local government.21        (6) Any building, real property, and parking area 22    under the control of an adult or juvenile detention or 23    correctional institution, prison, or jail.24        (7) Any building, real property, and parking area 25    under the control of a public or private hospital or 26    hospital affiliate, mental health facility, or nursing   SB1336- 3 -LRB104 03854 RLC 13878 b1    home.2        (8) (Blank). Any bus, train, or form of transportation 3    paid for in whole or in part with public funds, and any 4    building, real property, and parking area under the 5    control of a public transportation facility paid for in 6    whole or in part with public funds.7        (9) Any building, real property, and parking area 8    under the control of an establishment that serves alcohol 9    on its premises, if more than 50% of the establishment's 10    gross receipts within the prior 3 months is from the sale 11    of alcohol. The owner of an establishment who knowingly 12    fails to prohibit concealed firearms on its premises as 13    provided in this paragraph or who knowingly makes a false 14    statement or record to avoid the prohibition on concealed 15    firearms under this paragraph is subject to the penalty 16    under subsection (c-5) of Section 10-1 of the Liquor 17    Control Act of 1934.18        (10) Any public gathering or special event conducted 19    on property open to the public that requires the issuance 20    of a permit from the unit of local government, provided 21    this prohibition shall not apply to a licensee who must 22    walk through a public gathering in order to access his or 23    her residence, place of business, or vehicle.24        (11) Any building or real property that has been 25    issued a Special Event Retailer's license as defined in 26    Section 1-3.17.1 of the Liquor Control Act during the time   SB1336- 4 -LRB104 03854 RLC 13878 b1    designated for the sale of alcohol by the Special Event 2    Retailer's license, or a Special use permit license as 3    defined in subsection (q) of Section 5-1 of the Liquor 4    Control Act during the time designated for the sale of 5    alcohol by the Special use permit license.6        (12) Any public playground.7        (13) (Blank). Any public park, athletic area, or 8    athletic facility under the control of a municipality or 9    park district, provided nothing in this Section shall 10    prohibit a licensee from carrying a concealed firearm 11    while on a trail or bikeway if only a portion of the trail 12    or bikeway includes a public park.13        (14) Any real property under the control of the Cook 14    County Forest Preserve District.15        (15) Any building, classroom, laboratory, medical 16    clinic, hospital, artistic venue, athletic venue, 17    entertainment venue, officially recognized 18    university-related organization property, whether owned or 19    leased, and any real property, including parking areas, 20    sidewalks, and common areas under the control of a public 21    or private community college, college, or university.22        (16) Any building, real property, or parking area 23    under the control of a gaming facility licensed under the 24    Illinois Gambling Act or the Illinois Horse Racing Act of 25    1975, including an inter-track wagering location licensee.26        (17) Any stadium, arena, or the real property or   SB1336- 5 -LRB104 03854 RLC 13878 b1    parking area under the control of a stadium, arena, or any 2    collegiate or professional sporting event.3        (18) Any building, real property, or parking area 4    under the control of a public library.5        (19) Any building, real property, or parking area 6    under the control of an airport.7        (20) Any building, real property, or parking area 8    under the control of an amusement park.9        (21) Any building, real property, or parking area 10    under the control of a zoo or museum.11        (22) Any street, driveway, parking area, property, 12    building, or facility, owned, leased, controlled, or used 13    by a nuclear energy, storage, weapons, or development site 14    or facility regulated by the federal Nuclear Regulatory 15    Commission. The licensee shall not under any circumstance 16    store a firearm or ammunition in his or her vehicle or in a 17    compartment or container within a vehicle located anywhere 18    in or on the street, driveway, parking area, property, 19    building, or facility described in this paragraph.20        (23) Any area where firearms are prohibited under 21    federal law.22    (a-5) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit a public or 23private community college, college, or university from:24        (1) prohibiting persons from carrying a firearm within 25    a vehicle owned, leased, or controlled by the college or 26    university;  SB1336- 6 -LRB104 03854 RLC 13878 b1        (2) developing resolutions, regulations, or policies 2    regarding student, employee, or visitor misconduct and 3    discipline, including suspension and expulsion;4        (3) developing resolutions, regulations, or policies 5    regarding the storage or maintenance of firearms, which 6    must include designated areas where persons can park 7    vehicles that carry firearms; and8        (4) permitting the carrying or use of firearms for the 9    purpose of instruction and curriculum of officially 10    recognized programs, including but not limited to military 11    science and law enforcement training programs, or in any 12    designated area used for hunting purposes or target 13    shooting.14    (a-10) The owner of private real property of any type may 15prohibit the carrying of concealed firearms on the property 16under his or her control. The owner must post a sign in 17accordance with subsection (d) of this Section indicating that 18firearms are prohibited on the property, unless the property 19is a private residence.20    (b) Notwithstanding subsections (a), (a-5), and (a-10) of 21this Section except under paragraph (22) or (23) of subsection 22(a), any licensee prohibited from carrying a concealed firearm 23into the parking area of a prohibited location specified in 24subsection (a), (a-5), or (a-10) of this Section shall be 25permitted to carry a concealed firearm on or about his or her 26person within a vehicle into the parking area and may store a   SB1336- 7 -LRB104 03854 RLC 13878 b1firearm or ammunition concealed in a case within a locked 2vehicle or locked container out of plain view within the 3vehicle in the parking area. A licensee may carry a concealed 4firearm in the immediate area surrounding his or her vehicle 5within a prohibited parking lot area only for the limited 6purpose of storing or retrieving a firearm within the 7vehicle's trunk. For purposes of this subsection, "case" 8includes a glove compartment or console that completely 9encloses the concealed firearm or ammunition, the trunk of the 10vehicle, or a firearm carrying box, shipping box, or other 11container.12    (c) A licensee shall not be in violation of this Section 13while he or she is traveling along a public right of way that 14touches or crosses any of the premises under subsection (a), 15(a-5), or (a-10) of this Section if the concealed firearm is 16carried on his or her person in accordance with the provisions 17of this Act or is being transported in a vehicle by the 18licensee in accordance with all other applicable provisions of 19law.20    (d) Signs stating that the carrying of firearms is 21prohibited shall be clearly and conspicuously posted at the 22entrance of a building, premises, or real property specified 23in this Section as a prohibited area, unless the building or 24premises is a private residence. Signs shall be of a uniform 25design as established by the Illinois State Police and shall 26be 4 inches by 6 inches in size. The Illinois State Police   SB1336- 8 -LRB104 03854 RLC 13878 b1shall adopt rules for standardized signs to be used under this 2subsection.3(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.